District of Columbia statutes.
2-1509

Rules of operation for neighborhood planning councils.

The neighborhood planning councils shall establish, under the auspices of the Director of the Department of Recreation, uniform rules governing their operation and internal structure. These rules shall include a statement of neighborhood planning council responsibilities, voting procedures, the establishment of standing committees, the manner of selecting chairpersons and other officers, procedures for prompt review and action on committee recommendations, and procedures for receipt and action upon community recommendations at both the local neighborhood planning council and citywide council of chairpersons levels. Said rules shall be filed with the Director of the Department of Recreation and published in the D.C. Register.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 10, 23 DCR 9532b
1981 Ed., § 1-2609.
1973 Ed., § 6-2009.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation” renamed the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”